New Jersey, session 222, S2300.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Environmental Protection shall develop a plan for the continued operation of all State parks and forests, State recreation areas, State historic sites, State natural areas, and State wildlife management areas during a state of emergency that is declared due to the failure to enact a general appropriation law by the deadline prescribed by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 2 of the New Jersey Constitution.  The plan shall designate the State employees that are essential to provide for the services at each State park and forest, State recreation area, State historic site, State natural area, and State wildlife management area. b.    In the event that a state of emergency is declared due to the failure to enact a general appropriation law by the deadline prescribed by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 2 of the New Jersey Constitution, the operation of State parks and forests, State recreation areas, State historic sites, State natural areas, and State wildlife management areas shall continue and all such locations shall be open to the public for a period not to exceed seven calendar days.  All State employees that have been designated as necessary to provide for the government services at each State park and forest, State recreation area, State historic site, State natural area, and State wildlife management area shall be considered essential personnel. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.